District of Columbia statutes.
44-1637

Application to existing institutional funds.

This chapter applies to institutional funds existing on or established after January 23, 2008. As applied to institutional funds existing on January 23, 2008, this chapter governs only decisions made or actions taken on or after that date.

History

Jan. 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-69, § 8, 54 DCR 11650

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act of 2007.